District of Columbia statutes.
42-1741

Repealed

Fees.

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 6, 30 DCR 390
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1233(e), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 45-1925.
Delegation of authority under Law 4-209, see Mayor’s Order 83-123, May 6, 1983.